District of Columbia statutes.
24-231.15

Transfer of assets.

All assets which, on May 8, 1996, are components of the Correctional Industries Fund, as created by § 24-271 [repealed], shall be transferred to the Fund created in § 24-231.02.

May 8, 1996, D.C. Law 11-117, § 16, 43 DCR 1179
Unemployment compensation, eligibility, see § 51-109.
1981 Ed., § 24-458.15.
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 19 of D.C. Law 11-117 provided that, in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, the Mayor shall issue rules to implement this subchapter.